District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Health Occupations Revision Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 502(a) of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of
1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.02(a)), is amended
by adding a new paragraph (3B) to read as follows:
“(3B) To an individual licensed, registered, or certified in good standing to
practice a health occupation in another country who is in the District to attend to the healthcare
needs of an athletic team from another country that is competing in an organized sporting event,
as defined by section 3(3A) of the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979,
effective September 28, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-22; D.C. Official Code § 7-1702(3A)); provided, that:
“(A) The time period during which the exemption to the provisions of this
act prohibiting the practice of a health occupation without a District of Columbia license,
registration, or certification shall not exceed 30 consecutive days;
“(B) The exemption shall be limited to healthcare provided to the athletes,
support personnel, and coaching staff of the athletic team at the team basecamp, lodging, and
training sites, and at the site of any matches within the District while the team is competing in
those matches; and
“(C) The exemption shall not provide authority to the individual to
practice at a healthcare clinic or facility in the District; or”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2